Idaho, session 2025, H0404.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-1002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-1002. DEFINITIONS. (1) "Chickens" means domesticated fowl (genus
Gallus) raised primarily for the residential, noncommercial production of
eggs or meat to support self-sufficiency and household consumption or for
trade.
(2) "Community gardening" means a single plot of land that is gardened
collectively by a group of people. Community gardens can be further divided
into single plots or maintained as one (1) large plot. Entities, including
but not limited to schools, food pantries, and faith-based organizations,
often host community gardens. City or county land bank properties as well as
privately owned plots are used for community gardens.
(2) (3) "Market gardening" means small-scale production of agricul-
tural products grown to sell through marketing channels such as farmers
markets and community supported agriculture shares.
(3) (4) "Urban farming" means farming that produces food crops for
sale to others and can be larger in scale than market gardening. Urban
farms may be organized as for-profit businesses operated by individuals or
as nonprofit social enterprises designed to provide food to address food
insecurity, provide vocational training, or address another community is-
sue, typically at the neighborhood level. Urban farms operated as social
enterprises are typically managed by nongovernmental organizations. Urban
farming includes indoor controlled-environment production, including hy-
droponic and aquaponic systems.
(4) (5) "Victory gardening" means producing food at one's residence
primarily for household consumption or donation.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 10, Title 22, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 22-1003, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
22-1003. CHICKEN OWNERSHIP. (1) The Idaho legislature maintains that,
as recognized in section 22-4501, Idaho Code, the right to farm is a natu-
ral right and is recognized as a permitted use throughout the state of Idaho.
Therefore, no deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements


running with the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting own-
ership or pasturing of chickens, as that term is defined in section 22-1002,
Idaho Code.
(2) A homeowner's association shall not prohibit chicken ownership en-
tirely, but may adopt reasonable rules related to the housing and pasturing
of chickens, including but not limited to rules regarding manure and odor
management or a prohibition or restriction on the ownership of roosters,
provided that such rules do not impose undue burdens on the homeowner's
rights to raise chickens for personal use.
(3) Chicken owners shall assume the responsibility for education re-
garding chicken health and ownership, including learning about manure, dis-
ease management, and other liabilities regarding chicken ownership.
(4) City, county, and other local ordinances shall prevail over this
section.
(5) This section applies to single-family dwellings only and does not
apply to multifamily units such as duplexes, apartments, or other attached
housing buildings or to single-family dwellings that are on lots smaller
than one-quarter (.25) acre.
(6) This section does not apply to agricultural zones, rural proper-
ties, farms, or hobby farms where existing zoning regulations permit the
keeping of poultry, including urban farming zones where local regulations
allow for chicken ownership.
SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.